Massachusetts, session 194th, S2433.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 161B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following definition:-
“Electric vehicles,” vehicles that rely solely on electric motors for propulsion and
includes non-combustion vehicles.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of said chapter 161B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after paragraph (r), the following paragraph:-
(s) The authorities shall operate electric vehicles with a priority for operating such buses
on routes serving environmental justice populations as defined in section 62 of chapter 30.
Authorities shall conduct robust community outreach and engagement with residents of
environmental justice populations, municipal officials in cities and towns that have
of 3

environmental justice populations, and with transportation and environmental justice advocates.
The authorities shall implement electrification along all regional transit authorities by no later
than December 31, 2035 and meet the following procurement targets.
The Secretary, in consultation with the executive office for administration and finance,
shall require that new electric vehicles purchased by the authorities shall be electric vehicles
according to the following deadlines: (i) 40 per cent of all purchases in 2028; (ii) 60 per cent of
all purchases in 2030; and (iii) 80 per cent of all purchases in 2032.
The authorities shall report annually to the Regional Transit Authority Council
established pursuant to section 27 of chapter 161B on the progress of electrifying their fleets. As
part of the public reports, authorities shall include information on any fossil fuel infrastructure or
fossil fuel-powered vehicles procured during the reporting period and the reasons for procuring
internal combustion engines and fossil fuel infrastructure in lieu of electric vehicles and zero-
emission infrastructure.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 161B is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 28. The department of transportation shall establish a central planning and
procurement office by December 31, 2026. The central planning and procurement office shall be
tasked with technical, planning, grant writing, procurement, and worker retraining support for
implementation of the electric vehicle bus rollout plans as described in section 78 and chapter
179 of the Acts of 2022 for each individual regional transit authority by June 30, 2027.
The department shall provide information and support for any employees who may
become unemployed as a result of regional transit authorities’ transition to electric buses,
including, but not limited to, free retraining options and hiring assistance to transition to another
of 3

role. The employers of any labor required to design, build, and maintain infrastructure as
described by said rollout plans will pay a prevailing wage, be subject to project labor
agreements, and at a minimum remain neutral to unionization efforts.
The department of transportation, in consultation with the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs, shall identify sources of funding to support the implementation of the
electric vehicle bus rollout plans and may pursue federal funding opportunities to support electric
vehicle penetration throughout the Commonwealth in accordance with the requirements of
chapter 21N.
of 3